Utah statutes.
32B-1-204.   Powers of local authority.

(1)  If this title expressly addresses an issue related to alcoholic product control in this state, a local authority may not regulate in relation to that issue except when a local authority is expressly granted regulatory authority to regulate the issue by this title.

(2)  If this title does not expressly address an issue related to alcoholic product control, a local authority may regulate that issue if the regulation:

(a)  is of the sale, offer for sale, furnishing, or consumption of an alcoholic product; and

(b)  does not conflict with this title.

